Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.060

Enrollment options information—Earned credits—Participation in district-sponsored interscholastic programs.

(1) School districts must provide information to parents and the general public about charter schools located within the district as an enrollment option for students.

(2) If a student who was previously enrolled in a charter school enrolls in another public school in the state, the student's new school must accept credits earned by the student in the charter school in the same manner and according to the same criteria that credits are accepted from other public schools.

(3) A charter school may participate in state or district-sponsored interscholastic programs, awards, scholarships, or competitions to the same extent as other public schools.

[ 2016 c 241 s 106. Prior: 2013 c 2 s 206 (Initiative Measure No. 1240, approved November 6, 2012).]